Utah statutes.
36-1-203.   Omissions from maps -- How resolved.

(1)  If any area of the state is omitted from a Utah House of Representatives district in the House block assignment file enacted by the Legislature, the county clerk of the affected county, upon discovery of the omission, shall attach the area to the appropriate House district according to the requirements of Subsections (2) and (3).

(2)  If the omitted area is surrounded by a single House district, the county clerk shall attach the area to that district.

(3)  If the omitted area is contiguous to two or more House districts, the county clerk shall attach the area to the district that has the least population, as determined by the official census population figures and maps described in Subsection 36-1-201.5(2).

(4) The county clerk shall certify in writing and file with the lieutenant governor any attachment made under this section.

